Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Masc_Consonant1L.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounMascConstant1LStem;

LEXICON NounMascConstant1LStem   

හිවල NounMascConstant1;
හුරතල NounMascConstant1;
සුරතල NounMascConstant1;
සැවුල NounMascConstant1;
වැඩිමල NounMascConstant1;
වවුල NounMascConstant1;
වහල NounMascConstant1;
රංකුඹල NounMascConstant1;
බළල NounMascConstant1;




LEXICON NounMascConstant1


්+N+RT+PL+ACC:්ලු  #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:්ලුත්  #;
්+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:්ලුයි  #;
